dictsource/db_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Dobrujan Tatar


// Vowels
.L01 a î o u
.L02 e i

// Consonants
.L03 b ç d f g ğ h j k l m n ñ p r s ş t v w y z


.group a
   a       A
   a (_   'A
   a (L03_ 'A

.group á
   á       &
   á (_   '&
   á (L03_ '&

.group b
   b       b
   bb      b:

.group ç
   ç       tS
   çç      tS:

.group d
   d       d
   dd      d:

.group e
   e       e
   e (_   'e
   e (L03_ 'e

.group f
   f       f

.group g
   g       g
   g (L01  G
   g (L02  J

.group ğ
   ğ       dZ

.group h
   h       h

.group i
   i       i
   i (_   'i
   i (L03_ 'i
   iy (_  'i:

.group í
   í       I
   í (_   'I
   í (L03_ 'I

.group î
   î       @
   î (_   '@
   î (L03_ '@

.group j
   j       Z

.group k
   k       k
   kk      k:
   k (L01 q
   L01) k (K q
   k (L02 c
   kk (L01

.group l
   l       l
   l (L01 L
   L01) l (K L

.group m
   m       m
   mîz (_  =m@z

.group n
   n       n

.group ñ
   ñ       N
   ñîz (_  =N@z

.group o
   o       o
   o (_   'o
   o (L04_ 'o

.group ó
   ó       8
   ó (_   '8
   ó (L03_ '8

.group p
   p       p
   pp      p:

.group r
   r       r

.group s
   s       s
   sîn (_  =s@n
   sîñ (_  =s@N

.group ş
   ş       S

.group t
   t       t
   tt      t:

.group u
   u       u
   u (_   'u
   u (L03_ 'u

.group ú
   ú       y
   ú (_   'y
   ú (L03_ 'y

.group v
   v       v

.group w
   w       w

.group y
   y       j

.group z
   z       z
